Alaska statutes. Title 18. Health, Safety, Housing, Human Rights, and Public Defender.
Article 5. Access to Adoption Information.

Sec. 18.50.500.
Identity of biological parents.

After receiving a request by an adopted person 18 years of age or older for the identity of a biological parent of the person, the state registrar shall provide the person with an uncertified copy of the person’s original birth certificate and any change in the biological parent’s name or address attached to the certificate.

The state registrar may not disclose the name and address of a biological parent, except as required under (a) of this section or by the court under AS

25.23.150

.

An adopted person 18 years of age or older, or a biological parent, may submit to the state registrar a notice of change of name or address. The state registrar shall attach the information to the original birth certificate of the adopted person.

The state registrar shall disclose to a biological parent, at that parent’s request, the most current name and address of an adopted child that appear in the state registrar’s adoption files if the child is 18 years of age or older and has requested in writing that the information be disclosed if ever requested by the biological parent.

History.

(§ 4 ch 140 SLA 1986)

Opinions of attorney general. —

Although some provisions of a bill (see ch. 140, SLA 1986, enacting this article) which would have accorded adopted persons who are 18 years of age or older a statutory right to a potentially substantial amount of information about their “natural” parents, and which would make it clear that Alaska’s adoption statutes do not prohibit court-sanctioned post-adoption visitation between adopted persons and their natural parents and relatives, could have engendered a constitutional challenge, the challenge would not have been fatal to the entire bill. June 5, 1986 Op. Att’y Gen.

Collateral references. —

Restricting access to judicial records of concluded adoption proceedings.
103 ALR5th 255.

Sec. 18.50.510.
Descriptive information regarding biological parents.

The state registrar shall, at the request of an adoptive parent or of an adopted person 18 years of age or older, release the following information regarding a biological parent named on the original birth certificate of the adopted person if available from the registrar’s adoption records:

the age of the biological parent on the day the adopted person was born;

the heritage of the biological parent, to include

national origin;

ethnic background; and

tribal membership;

the medical history of the biological parent and of blood relatives of the biological parent;

the number of years of school completed by the biological parent by the day the adopted person was born;

a physical description of the biological parent on the day the adopted person was born, including height, weight, and color of hair, eyes, and skin;

the existence of other children of the biological parent;

whether the biological parent was alive at the time of adoption;

the religion of the biological parent; and

other information provided by the biological parent for disclosure to the child, which may include such items as photographs, letters, and a statement explaining the reasons for the adoption.

Information released under (a) of this section shall be on a standard form prepared by the commissioner. The information may not include the name of a biological parent or other information not listed in (a) of this section.

History.

(§ 4 ch 140 SLA 1986)